Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0793.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 3. (1) "Plant rehabilitation district" means an area of a local governmental unit established as provided in section 4. "Commencement" of the restoration, replacement, or construction means the date the first building or other trade permit is issued related to the restoration, replacement, or construction of the facility, unless sufficient documented proof can be provided to show that restoration, replacement, or construction did not start until a later date. Commencement of the restoration, replacement, or construction does not include demolition activity, or the issuance of a demolition permit, that occurs before the issue date of the first building or other trade permit. (2) "Development organization" means any economic development corporation, downtown development authority, tax increment financing authority, or organization under the supervision of and created for economic development purposes by a local governmental unit. (3) (2) "Industrial development district" means an area established by a local governmental unit as provided in under section 4. (3) "Industrial facility tax" means the specific tax levied under this act. (4) "Industrial facilities exemption certificate" means a certificate issued pursuant to sections 5, 6, and 7. (5) "Industrial facility tax" means the specific tax levied under this act. (6) "Manufacturing facility" means buildings and structures, including the machinery, equipment, furniture, and fixtures located in the buildings and structures, the primary purpose of which is 1 or more of the following: (a) The manufacture of goods or materials or the processing of goods and materials by physical or chemical change. (b) The provision of research and development laboratories of companies whether or not the company manufactures the products developed from their research activities. (7) "Michigan economic development corporation" means that term as defined in section 4 of the Michigan strategic fund act, 1984 PA 270, MCL 125.2004. (8) "Michigan strategic fund" means the Michigan strategic fund created in section 5 of the Michigan strategic fund act, 1984 PA 270, MCL 125.2005. (9) "Plant rehabilitation district" means an area of a local governmental unit established under section 4. (10) (5) "Replacement" means the complete or partial demolition of obsolete industrial property and the complete or partial reconstruction or installation of new property of similar utility. (11) (6) "Restoration" means changes to obsolete industrial property other than replacement as may be required to restore the property, together with all appurtenances to the property, to an economically efficient functional condition. Restoration does not include delayed maintenance or the substitution or addition of tangible personal property without major renovation of the industrial property. A program involving expenditures for changes to the industrial property improvements aggregating less than 10% of the true cash value at commencement of the restoration of the industrial property improvements is delayed maintenance. Restoration includes major both of the following: (a) Major renovation, including, but not necessarily limited to, all of the following: (i) The improvement of floor loads. , (ii) The correction of deficient or excessive height. , new (iii) New or improved building equipment, including heating, ventilation, and lighting. , reducing (iv) Reducing multistory facilities to 1 or 2 stories. , improved (v) Improved structural support, including foundations. , improved (vi) Improved roof structure and cover. , floor (vii) Floor replacement. , improved (viii) Improved wall placement. , improved (ix) Improved exterior and interior appearance of buildings. , improvements (x) Improvements or modifications of machinery and equipment to improve efficiency, decrease operating costs, or to increase productive capacity. , and other (xi) Other physical changes as may be required to restore the industrial property to an economically efficient functional condition. , and shall include land (b) Land and building improvements and other tangible personal property incident to the improvements. (7) "State equalized valuation" means the valuation determined under 1911 PA 44, MCL 209.1 to 209.8. (12) (8) "Speculative building" means a building that meets 1 of the following criteria and the machinery, equipment, furniture, and fixtures located in the building: (a) A new building that meets all of the following: (i) The building is owned by, or approved as a speculative building by resolution of, a local governmental unit in which the building is located or the building is owned by a development organization and located in the district of the development organization. (ii) The building is constructed for the purpose of providing a manufacturing facility before the identification of a specific user of that building. (iii) The building does not qualify as a replacement facility. (b) The building is an existing building on an improved parcel of industrial property used for the manufacturing of goods or materials or processing of goods or materials. Not more than 1 building shall be awarded an industrial facilities exemption certificate under this subdivision. A building that complies with this subdivision shall be is presumed to have been constructed within 9 years of the filing of the application for an industrial facilities exemption certificate and shall comply with must meet all of the following requirements: (i) Has Have been unoccupied for at least 4 years immediately preceding the date the certificate is issued. (ii) Is Be in an industrial development district created before January 1, 2011. (iii) Is Be located in a county with a population of more than 22,000 and less than 24,500 containing a city with a population of more than 3,600 according to the last decennial census. (9) "Development organization" means any economic development corporation, downtown development authority, tax increment financing authority, or an organization under the supervision of and created for economic development purposes by a local governmental unit. (10) "Manufacturing facility" means buildings and structures, including the machinery, equipment, furniture, and fixtures located therein, the primary purpose of which is 1 or more of the following: (a) The manufacture of goods or materials or the processing of goods and materials by physical or chemical change. (b) The provision of research and development laboratories of companies whether or not the company manufactures the products developed from their research activities. (11) "Taxable value" means that value determined under section 27a of the general property tax act, 1893 PA 206, MCL 211.27a. (13) "State equalized valuation" means the valuation determined under 1911 PA 44, MCL 209.1 to 209.8. (14) (12) "Strategic response center" means a facility that provides catastrophe response solutions through the development and staffing of a national response center for which a plant rehabilitation district or an industrial development district was created before December 31, 2007. (15) "Taxable value" means that value determined under section 27a of the general property tax act, 1893 PA 206, MCL 211.27a. Sec. 6. (1) The legislative body of the local governmental unit, not more than 60 days after receipt by its clerk of the application, shall by resolution either approve or disapprove the application for an industrial facilities exemption certificate in accordance with section 9 and the other provisions of this act. If disapproved, the reasons shall be set forth in writing in the resolution. If approved, the clerk shall forward the application to the commission within 60 days of after approval or before October 31 of that year, whichever is first, or as otherwise provided in section 7 in order to receive the industrial facilities exemption certificate effective for the following year. If disapproved, the clerk shall return the application to the applicant. The applicant may appeal the disapproval to the commission within 10 days after the date of the disapproval.the reasons must be set forth in writing in the resolution, and the clerk shall send, by certified mail, a copy of the resolution to the applicant and the assessor. (2) A new industrial facilities exemption certificate shall must not be approved and issued under this act after December 30, 2021 for any personal property that qualifies as eligible manufacturing personal property as defined under section 9m of the general property tax act, 1893 PA 206, MCL 211.9m. Sec. 7. (1) Within 60 days after receipt of an approved application or an appeal of a disapproved application that was submitted to the commission before October 31 of that year, the commission shall determine whether the facility is a speculative building or designed and acquired primarily for the purpose of restoration or replacement of obsolete industrial property or the construction of new industrial property, and whether the facility otherwise complies with section 9 and with the other provisions of this act. If the commission so finds, it shall issue an industrial facilities exemption certificate. Before issuing a certificate, the commission shall must notify the state treasurer of the application and shall must obtain the written concurrence of the department of licensing and regulatory affairs Michigan strategic fund or, if the Michigan strategic fund delegates this action to the Michigan economic development corporation, the Michigan economic development corporation, that the application complies with the requirements in section 9. Except as otherwise provided in this section and section 7a, the effective date of the certificate for a replacement facility or new facility is the immediately succeeding December 31 following the date the certificate is issued. For a speculative building or a portion of a speculative building, except as otherwise provided in section 7a, the effective date of the certificate is the immediately succeeding December 31 following the date the speculative building, or the portion of a speculative building, is used as a manufacturing facility. (2) The commission shall send an industrial facilities exemption certificate, when issued, by mail to the applicant , and a certified copy by mail to the assessor of the assessing unit in which the facility is located or to be located. , and that The copy shall of the certificate sent to the assessor must be filed in his or her the assessor's office. Notice of the commission's refusal to issue a certificate shall must be sent by mail to the same persons. (3) Notwithstanding any other provision of this act, if on December 29, 1986 a local governmental unit passed a resolution approving an exemption certificate for 10 years for real and personal property but the commission did not receive the application until 1992 and the application was not made complete until 1995, then the commission shall issue, for that property, an industrial facilities exemption certificate that begins December 30, 1987 and ends December 30, 1997. (4) Notwithstanding any other provision of this act, if pursuant to under section 16a a local governmental unit passed a resolution approving an industrial facilities exemption certificate for a new facility on October 14, 2003 for a certificate that expired in December 2002, the commission shall issue for that property an industrial facilities exemption certificate that begins on December 30, 2002 and ends December 30, 2009. (5) Notwithstanding any other provision of this act, if on or before February 10, 2007 a local governmental unit passed a resolution approving an amendment of an industrial facilities exemption certificate for a replacement facility and that certificate was revoked by the commission effective December 30, 2005 with the order of revocation issued by the commission on April 10, 2006, notwithstanding the revocation, the commission shall retroactively amend the certificate and give full effect to the amended certificate, which shall must include the additional personal property expenditures described in the resolution amending the certificate, for the period of time beginning when the certificate was originally approved until the certificate was revoked. (6) Notwithstanding any other provision of this act, if on July 23, 2012, a local governmental unit passed a resolution approving an industrial facilities exemption certificate for a new facility, but the application was not made complete until 2013, the commission shall issue for that property an industrial facilities exemption certificate that begins on December 31, 2012 and ends December 31, 2024. (7) Notwithstanding any other provision of this act, if on February 21, 2012, a local governmental unit passed a resolution approving an industrial facilities exemption certificate for a new facility, but the application was not made complete until 2013, the commission shall issue for that property an industrial facilities exemption certificate that begins on December 31, 2012. (8) If the commission receives an application under this act for an industrial facilities exemption certificate for a new facility or a replacement facility and the application is made complete before October 31 following the year in which the application is received by the commission, the commission may issue for that property an industrial facilities exemption certificate that has an effective date of December 31 of the year in which the application was received by the commission. (9) If an error or mistake in an application for an industrial facilities exemption certificate is discovered after the local governmental unit has passed a resolution approving the application or after the commission has issued a certificate for the application, an applicant may submit an amended application in the same manner as an original application under this act that corrects the error or mistake. The legislative body of the local governmental unit and the commission may approve or deny the amended application. If the commission previously issued a certificate for the original application and approves an amended application under this subsection, the commission shall issue an amended certificate for the amended application with the same effective date as the original certificate. (10) If the clerk of the qualified local governmental unit failed to forward an application, an amended or transfer application, or a request to revoke a certificate that was approved by the legislative body of the qualified local governmental unit before October 31 of that year to the commission before October 31 but filed the application, the amended or transfer application, or the request to revoke a certificate before October 31 of the immediately succeeding year and the commission approves the application, the amended or transfer application, or the request to revoke a certificate, notwithstanding any other provision of this act, the certificate shall be is considered to be issued, transferred, amended, or revoked on December 31 of the year in which the local governmental unit approved the application, the amended or transfer application, or the request to revoke the certificate. (11) Beginning October 1, 2013, the commission shall do all of the following for each industrial facilities exemption certificate approved or disapproved by the commission under subsection (8), (9), or (10): (a) Notify the office of the member of the house of representatives of this state and the office of the senator of this state, who represent the geographic area in which the property covered by the application for a certificate is located, that an application for a certificate has been approved or disapproved under subsection (8), (9), or (10). (b) Publish on its website a copy of the certificate if approved, or a copy of the denial notice if disapproved, under subsection (8), (9), or (10) and whatever additional information the commission considers appropriate regarding the application. Sec. 9. (1) The legislative body of the local governmental unit, in its resolution approving an application, shall set forth a finding and determination that the granting of the industrial facilities exemption certificate, considered together with the aggregate amount of industrial facilities exemption certificates previously granted and currently in force, shall will not have the effect of substantially impeding impede the operation of the local governmental unit or impairing impair the financial soundness of a taxing unit that levies an ad valorem property tax in the local governmental unit in which the facility is located or is to be located. If the state equalized valuation of property proposed to be exempt pursuant to an application under consideration, considered together with the aggregate state equalized valuation of property exempt under certificates previously granted and currently in force, exceeds 5% of the state equalized valuation of the local governmental unit, the commission, with the approval of the state treasurer, shall make a separate finding and shall include a statement in the order approving the industrial facilities exemption certificate that exceeding that amount shall not have the effect of substantially impeding the operation of the local governmental unit or impairing the financial soundness of an affected taxing unit. (2) Except for an application for a speculative building, which is governed by subsection (4), the legislative body of the local governmental unit shall not approve an application and the commission shall not grant an industrial facilities exemption certificate unless the applicant complies with all of the following requirements: (a) The commencement of the restoration, replacement, or construction of the facility occurred not earlier than 12 months before the filing of the application for the industrial facilities exemption certificate. If the application is not filed within the 12-month period, the application may be filed within the succeeding 12-month period and the industrial facilities exemption certificate shall in this case expire expires 1 year earlier than it would have expired if the application had been timely filed. This subdivision does not apply for applications filed with the local governmental unit after December 31, 1983. (b) For applications made after December 31, 1983, the proposed facility shall be is located within a plant rehabilitation district or industrial development district that was duly established in a local governmental unit eligible under this act to establish a district and that was established upon on a request filed or by the local governmental unit's own initiative taken before the commencement of the restoration, replacement, or construction of the facility. (c) For applications made after December 31, 1983, the commencement of the restoration, replacement, or construction of the facility occurred not earlier than 6 months before the filing of the application for the industrial facilities exemption certificate. (d) The application relates to a construction, restoration, or replacement program that when completed constitutes a new or replacement facility within the meaning of this act and that shall be situated within a plant rehabilitation district or industrial development district duly established in a local governmental unit eligible under this act to establish the district. (e) Completion of the facility is calculated to, and will at the time of issuance of when the certificate is issued have the reasonable likelihood to, create employment, retain employment, prevent a loss of employment, or produce energy in the community in which the facility is situated. (f) Completion of the facility does not constitute merely the addition of machinery and equipment for the purpose of increasing productive capacity but rather is primarily for the purpose and will primarily have the effect of restoration, replacement, or updating the technology of obsolete industrial property. An increase in productive capacity, even though significant, is not an impediment to the issuance of an industrial facilities exemption certificate if other criteria in this section and act are met. This subdivision does not apply to a new facility. (g) The provisions of subdivision Subdivision (c) do does not apply to a new facility located in an existing industrial development district and owned by a person who filed an application that applied for an industrial facilities exemption certificate in April of 1992 if the application was approved by the local governing body and was denied by the state tax commission in April of 1993. (h) The provisions of subdivisions Subdivisions (b) and (c) and section 4(3) do not apply to 1 or more of the following: (i) A facility located in an industrial development district and owned by a person who filed an application that applied for an industrial facilities exemption certificate in October 1995 for construction that was commenced in July 1992 in a district that was established by the legislative body of the local governmental unit in July 1994. An industrial facilities exemption certificate described in this subparagraph shall expire expires as provided in section 16(3). (ii) A facility located in an industrial development district that was established in January 1994 and that was owned by a person who filed an application that applied for an industrial facilities exemption certificate in February 1994 if the personal property and real property portions of the application were approved by the legislative body of the local governmental unit and the personal property portion of the application was approved by the state tax commission in December 1994 and the real property portion of the application was denied by the state tax commission in December 1994. An industrial facilities exemption certificate described in this subparagraph shall expire expires as provided in section 16(3). (iii) A facility located in an industrial development district that was established in December 1995 and that was owned by a person who filed an application that applied for an industrial facilities exemptions certificate in November or December 1995 for construction that was commenced in September 1995. (iv) A facility located in an industrial development district and owned by a person who filed an application that applied for an industrial facilities exemption certificate in July 2001 for construction that was commenced in February 2001 in a district that was established by the legislative body of the local governmental unit in September 2001. An industrial facilities exemption certificate described in this subparagraph shall expire expires as provided in section 16. The facility described in this subparagraph shall must be taxed under this act as if it was granted an industrial facilities exemption certificate in October 2001, and a corrected tax bill shall must be issued by the local tax collecting unit if the local tax collecting unit has possession of the tax roll or by the county treasurer if the county has possession of the tax roll. If granting the industrial facilities exemption certificate under this subparagraph results in an overpayment of the tax, a rebate, including any interest and penalties paid, shall must be made to the taxpayer by the local tax collecting unit if the local tax collecting unit has possession of the tax roll or by the county treasurer if the county has possession of the tax roll within 30 days of the date the exemption is granted. The rebate shall be is without interest. (v) A facility located in an industrial development district and owned by a person who filed an application that applied for an industrial facilities exemption certificate in December 2005 for construction that was commenced in September 2005 in a district that was established by the legislative body of the local governmental unit in December 2005. An industrial facilities exemption certificate described in this subparagraph shall expire expires as provided in section 16. (vi) A facility located in an existing industrial development district and owned by a person who that filed or amended an application for an industrial facilities exemption certificate for real property in July 2006 if the application was approved by the legislative body of the local governmental unit in September 2006 but not submitted to the state tax commission until September 2006. (vii) A new facility located in an existing industrial development district and owned by a person who that filed or amended an application for an industrial facilities exemption certificate for personal property in June 2006 if the application was approved by the legislative body of the local governmental unit in August 2006 but not submitted to the state tax commission until 2007. The effective date of the certificate shall be is December 31, 2006. (viii) A new facility located in an industrial development district that was established by the legislative body of the local governmental unit in September of 2007 for construction that was commenced in March 2007 and for which an application for an industrial facilities exemption certificate was filed in September of 2007. (ix) A facility located in an industrial development district that was established by the legislative body of the local governmental unit in August 2007 and that was owned by a person who filed an application that applied for an industrial facilities exemption certificate in June 2007 for equipment that was purchased in January 2007. (x) A facility located in an industrial development district that otherwise meets the criteria of this act and that has received written approval from the chairperson of the Michigan economic growth authority.strategic fund. (xi) A new facility located in an industrial development district that was established by the legislative body of the local governmental unit in August of 2008 for construction that was commenced in December 2005 and a certificate of occupancy issued in September 2006 for which an application for an industrial facilities exemption certificate was filed in August of 2008. (xii) A facility located in an industrial development district and owned by a person who filed an application that applied for a certificate for real and personal property in April 2005 if the application was approved by the legislative body of the local governmental unit in July 2005 for construction that was commenced in July 2004. (xiii) A facility located in an industrial development district that was established by the legislative body of the local governmental unit in December 2007 for construction that was commenced in September 2007 and a certificate of occupancy issued in September 2008 for which an application for an industrial facilities exemption certificate was approved in May of 2008. (i) The provisions of subdivision Subdivision (c) do does not apply to any of the following: (i) A new facility located in an existing industrial development district and owned by a person who filed an application that applied for an industrial facilities exemption certificate in October 1993 if the application was approved by the legislative body of the local governmental unit and the real property portion of the application was denied by the state tax commission in December 1993. (ii) A new facility located in an existing industrial development district and owned by a person who filed an application that applied for an industrial facilities exemption certificate in September 1993 if the personal property portion of the application was approved by the legislative body of the local governmental unit and the real property portion of the application was denied by the legislative body of the local governmental unit in October 1993 and subsequently approved by the legislative body of the local governmental unit in September 1994. (iii) A facility located in an existing industrial development district and owned by a person who filed an application that applied for an industrial facilities exemption certificate in August 1993 if the application was approved by the local governmental unit in September 1993 and the application was denied by the state tax commission in December 1993. (iv) A facility located in an existing industrial development district and occupied by a person who filed an application that applied for an industrial facilities exemption certificate in June of 1995 if the application was approved by the legislative body of the local governmental unit in October of 1995 for construction that was commenced in November or December of 1994. (v) A facility located in an existing industrial development district and owned by a person who filed an application that applied for an industrial facilities exemption certificate in June of 1995 if the application was approved by the legislative body of the local governmental unit in July of 1995 and the personal property portion of the application was approved by the state tax commission in November of 1995. (j) If the facility is locating in a plant rehabilitation district or an industrial development district from another location in this state, the owner of the facility is not delinquent in any of the taxes described in section 10(1)(a) of the Michigan renaissance zone act, 1996 PA 376, MCL 125.2690, or substantially delinquent in any of the taxes described in and as provided under section 10(1)(b) of the Michigan renaissance zone act, 1996 PA 376, MCL 125.2690. (3) If the replacement facility when completed will not be located on the same premises or contiguous premises as the obsolete industrial property, then the applicant shall make provision provide for the obsolete industrial property by demolition, sale, or transfer to another person with the effect that the obsolete industrial property shall will within a reasonable time again be subject to assessment and taxation under the general property tax act, 1893 PA 206, MCL 211.1 to 211.155, or be used in a manner consistent with the general purposes of this act, subject to approval of the commission. (4) The legislative body of the local governmental unit shall not approve an application and the commission shall not grant an industrial facilities exemption certificate that applies to a speculative building unless the speculative building is located or is to be located in a plant rehabilitation district or industrial development district duly established by a local governmental unit eligible under this act to establish a district; the speculative building was constructed less than 9 years before the filing of the application for the industrial facilities exemption certificate; the speculative building has not been occupied since completion of construction; and the speculative building otherwise qualifies under subsection (2)(e) for an industrial facilities exemption certificate. An industrial facilities exemption certificate granted under this subsection shall expire expires as provided in section 16(3). (5) Not later than September 1, 1989, the commission shall provide to all local assessing units the name, address, and telephone number of the person on the commission staff responsible for providing procedural information concerning this act. After October 1, 1989, a local unit of government shall notify each prospective applicant of this information in writing. (6) Notwithstanding any other provision of this act, if on December 29, 1986 a local governmental unit passed a resolution approving an exemption certificate for 10 years for real and personal property but the commission did not receive the application until 1992 and the application was not made complete until 1995, then the commission shall issue, for that property, an industrial facilities exemption certificate that begins December 30, 1987 and ends December 30, 1997. The facility described in this subsection shall must be taxed under this act as if it was granted an industrial facilities exemption certificate on December 30, 1987. (7) Notwithstanding any other provision of this act, if a local governmental unit passed a resolution approving an industrial facilities exemption certificate for a new facility on July 8, 1991 but rescinded that resolution and passed a resolution approving an industrial facilities exemption certificate for that same facility as a replacement facility on October 21, 1996, the commission shall issue for that property an industrial facilities exemption certificate that begins December 30, 1991 and ends December 2003. The replacement facility described in this subsection shall must be taxed under this act as if it was granted an industrial facilities exemption certificate on December 30, 1991. (8) Property owned or operated by a casino is not industrial property or otherwise eligible for an abatement or reduction of ad valorem property taxes under this act. As used in this subsection, "casino" means a casino or a parking lot, hotel, motel, convention and trade center, or retail store owned or operated by a casino, an affiliate, or an affiliated company, regulated by this state pursuant to the Michigan gaming control and revenue act, Gaming Control and Revenue Act, 1996 IL 1, MCL 432.201 to 432.226. (9) Notwithstanding section 16a and any other provision of this act, if a local governmental unit passed a resolution approving an industrial facilities exemption certificate for a new facility on October 28, 1996 for a certificate that expired in December 2003 and the local governmental unit passes a resolution approving the extension of the certificate after December 2003 and before March 1, 2006, the commission shall issue for that property an industrial facilities exemption certificate that begins on December 30, 2005 and ends December 30, 2010 as long as the property continues to qualify under this act. (10) Notwithstanding any other provision of this act, if the commission issued an industrial facilities exemption certificate for a new facility on December 8, 1998 but revoked that industrial facilities exemption certificate for that same facility effective December 30, 2006 and that new facility is purchased by a buyer on or before November 1, 2007, the commission shall issue for that property an industrial facilities exemption certificate that begins December 31, 1998 and ends December 30, 2010 and shall transfer that industrial facilities exemption certificate to the buyer. The new facility described in this subsection shall must be taxed under this act as if it was granted an industrial facilities exemption certificate effective on December 31, 1998. (11) Notwithstanding any other provision of this act, if the commission issued industrial facilities exemption certificates for new facilities on October 30, 2002, September 9, 2003, and November 30, 2005 but revoked the industrial facilities exemption certificates for the same facilities effective December 30, 2007 and the new facilities continue to qualify under this act, the commission shall issue for the properties industrial facilities exemption certificates which that end respectively on December 30, 2008, December 30, 2009, and December 30, 2011. (12) Notwithstanding any other provision of this act, if in August 2008 a local governmental unit passed a resolution approving an exemption certificate for 12 years for real and personal property but the commission did not receive the application until 2008, then the commission shall issue, for that property, an industrial facilities exemption certificate that begins December 31, 2006 and ends December 30, 2018. The facility described in this subsection shall must be taxed under this act as if it had been granted an industrial facilities exemption certificate on December 31, 2006. (13) Notwithstanding any other provision of this act, if in September 2011 or October 2011 a local governmental unit passed a resolution approving an exemption certificate for 12 years for personal property but the commission did not receive the application until November 2011 and the commission approved the applications in May 2012, then the commission shall issue, for that property, an industrial facilities exemption certificate that begins December 31, 2011 and ends December 30, 2023. The facility described in this subsection shall must be taxed under this act as if it had been granted an industrial facilities exemption certificate on December 31, 2011. (14) Notwithstanding any other provision of this act, if on August 23, 2011 a local governmental unit passed a resolution approving an exemption certificate for 12 years for real property and the emergency manager subsequently appointed for that local community issued an order approving the exemption certificate on November 8, 2013 but the commission did not receive the application until November 27, 2013, then the commission shall issue, for that property, an industrial facilities exemption certificate that begins December 31, 2011 and ends December 30, 2023. The real property component of the facility described in this subsection shall must be taxed under this act as if it had been granted an industrial facilities exemption certificate on December 31, 2011.